Louisiana, session 2026, HB1059.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 17:5025(2)(a), 5025.5(2)(a), 5025.6(2)(a), 5025.7(2)(a), and
5026(A)(2)(a) and (c), (D)(2), (E)(2), and (F)(2)(a) and (c) are hereby amended and
reenacted to read as follows:
§5025. High school core curriculum requirements; Opportunity, Performance,
Honors, Excellence Awards
To be eligible for an Opportunity, Performance, Honors, or Excellence
Award pursuant to this Chapter, a student shall have successfully completed a core
curriculum which consists of twenty units of high school course work as follows:
* * *
(2) Mathematics - Four Units
(a) Algebra I or Integrated Mathematics I (one unit), Geometry or Integrated
Mathematics II (one unit), and Algebra II or Integrated Mathematics III (one unit).
Integrated Mathematics I, Integrated Mathematics II, and Integrated Mathematics III
may be substituted for the Algebra I, Geometry, and Algebra II sequence.
* * *
Page 1 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1059 ENROLLED
§5025.5. High school core curriculum requirements; Opportunity, Performance, and
Honors Awards; students graduating 2021-2022 through 2025-2026 school
year
To be eligible for an Opportunity, Performance, or Honors Award pursuant
to this Chapter, a student who graduates during the 2021-2022 through the 2025-
2026 school year shall have successfully completed a core curriculum which consists
of nineteen units of high school course work as follows:
* * *
(2) Mathematics - Four Units
(a)(i) Algebra I (one unit), Geometry (one unit), and Algebra II (one unit).
Integrated Mathematics I, Integrated Mathematics II, and Integrated Mathematics III
may be substituted for the Algebra I, Geometry, and Algebra II sequence. The
provisions of this Item apply to students graduating during the 2021-2022 school
year through the 2024-2025 school year.
(ii) Algebra I or Integrated Mathematics I (one unit), Geometry or Integrated
Mathematics II (one unit), and Algebra II or Integrated Mathematics III (one unit).
The provisions of this Item apply to students graduating during the 2025-2026 school
year.
* * *
§5025.6. High school core curriculum requirements; Opportunity, Performance, and
Honors Awards; students graduating in the 2026-2027 school year
To be eligible for an Opportunity, Performance, or Honors Award pursuant
to this Chapter, a student who graduated from high school during the 2026-2027
school year shall have successfully completed a core curriculum which consists of
nineteen units of high school course work as follows:
* * *
(2) Mathematics - Four Units
(a) Algebra I or Integrated Mathematics I (one unit), Geometry or Integrated
Mathematics II (one unit), and Algebra II or Integrated Mathematics III (one unit).
Page 2 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1059 ENROLLED
Integrated Mathematics I, Integrated Mathematics II, and Integrated Mathematics III
may be substituted for the Algebra I, Geometry, and Algebra II sequence.
* * *
§5025.7. High school core curriculum requirements; Opportunity, Performance, and
Honors Awards; students graduating 2027-2028 through 2029-2030 school
years
To be eligible for an Opportunity, Performance, or Honors Award pursuant
to this Chapter, a student who graduated during or after the 2027-2028 school year
but not later than the 2029-2030 school year shall have successfully completed a core
curriculum which consists of twenty units of high school course work as follows:
* * *
(2) Mathematics - Four Units
(a) Algebra I or Integrated Mathematics I (one unit), Geometry or Integrated
Mathematics II (one unit), and Algebra II or Integrated Mathematics III (one unit).
Integrated Mathematics I, Integrated Mathematics II, and Integrated Mathematics III
may be substituted for the Algebra I, Geometry, and Algebra II sequence.
* * *
§5026. High school core curriculum requirements; TOPS-Tech
A. To be eligible for a TOPS-Tech Award pursuant to this Chapter, the
student shall have successfully completed the core curriculum requirements of R.S.
17:5025 or the core curriculum defined as follows:
* * *
(2) Math - Four Units
(a) Algebra I, Algebra I Part One and Algebra I Part Two, Integrated
Mathematics I, or an applied or hybrid algebra course (one unit), and Geometry,
Integrated Mathematics II, or an applied Geometry course (one unit).
* * *
(c) One or more units from the following: Algebra II, or Integrated
Mathematics III, Math Essentials, Business Math, Algebra III, Advanced Math -
Functions and Statistics, Advanced Math - Pre-Calculus, Pre-Calculus, Computer
Page 3 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1059 ENROLLED
Science, or comparable Louisiana Technical College courses offered by Jump Start
regional teams as approved by the State Board of Elementary and Secondary
Education. Integrated Mathematics I, II, and III may be substituted for Algebra I,
Geometry, and Algebra II and shall equal three mathematics credits.
* * *
D. For a student graduating during or after the 2017-2018 school year but
prior to the 2026-2027 school year, to be eligible for a TOPS-Tech Award pursuant
to this Chapter, the student shall have successfully completed the core curriculum
requirements of R.S. 17:5025 or the core curriculum defined as follows:
* * *
(2) Math - Four Units
(a)(i) Algebra I (one unit);, or both Algebra I, Part 1 One and Algebra I, Part
2; Two, or an applied or hybrid algebra course (one unit). The provisions of this
Item apply to students graduating during the 2017-2018 school year through the
2024-2025 school year.
(ii) Algebra I, Algebra I Part One and Algebra I Part Two, Integrated
Mathematics I, or an applied or hybrid algebra course (one unit). The provisions of
this Item apply to students graduating during the 2025-2026 school year.
(b)(i) Three or more units from the following: Geometry, Algebra II, Math
Essentials, Financial Literacy, Business Math, Algebra III, Advanced Math -
Functions and Statistics, Advanced Math - Pre-Calculus, Pre-calculus, or comparable
Louisiana Technical College courses offered by Jump Start regional teams as
approved by the State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education. Integrated
Mathematics I, II, and III may be substituted for Algebra I, Geometry, and Algebra
II, and shall equal three mathematics credits. The provisions of this Item apply to
students graduating during the 2017-2018 school year through the 2024-2025 school
year.
(ii) Three or more units from the following: Geometry, Algebra II or
Integrated Math III, Math Essentials, Financial Literacy, Business Math, Algebra III,
Advanced Math - Functions and Statistics, Advanced Math - Pre-Calculus,
Page 4 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1059 ENROLLED
Pre-calculus, or comparable Louisiana Technical College courses offered by Jump
Start regional teams as approved by the State Board of Elementary and Secondary
Education. The provisions of this Item apply to students graduating during the 2025-
2026 school year.
* * *
E. For a student graduating during the 2026-2027 school year to be eligible
for a TOPS-Tech Award pursuant to this Chapter, the student shall have successfully
completed the core curriculum requirements of R.S. 17:5025 or the core curriculum
defined as follows:
* * *
(2) Math - Four Units
(a) Algebra I;, both Algebra I, Part One and Algebra I, Part Two, Integrated
Mathematics I, or an applied or hybrid algebra course (one unit) and Geometry,
Integrated Mathematics II, or an applied Geometry course (one unit).
(b) Two or more units from the following: Algebra II, or Integrated
Mathematics III, Math Essentials, Financial Literacy, Business Math, Algebra III,
Advanced Math - Functions and Statistics, Advanced Math - Pre-Calculus,
Pre-Calculus, or comparable Louisiana Technical College courses offered by Jump
Start regional teams as approved by the State Board of Elementary and Secondary
Education. Integrated Mathematics I, II, and III may be substituted for Algebra I,
Geometry, and Algebra II, and shall equal three mathematics credits.
* * *
F. For a student graduating during or after the 2027-2028 school year but
prior to the 2030-2031 school year to be eligible for a TOPS-Tech Award pursuant
to this Chapter, the student shall have successfully completed the core curriculum
requirements of R.S. 17:5025 or the core curriculum defined as follows:
* * *
Page 5 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1059 ENROLLED
(2) Math - Four Units
(a) Algebra I, Algebra I Part One and Algebra I Part Two, Integrated
Mathematics I, or an applied or hybrid algebra course (one unit), and Geometry,
Integrated Mathematics II, or an applied Geometry course (one unit).
* * *
(c) One or more units from the following: Algebra II, or Integrated
Mathematics III, Math Essentials, Business Math, Algebra III, Advanced Math -
Functions and Statistics, Advanced Math - Pre-Calculus, Pre-Calculus, or
comparable Louisiana Technical College courses offered by Jump Start regional
teams as approved by the State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education.
Integrated Mathematics I, II, and III may be substituted for Algebra I, Geometry, and
Algebra II and shall equal three mathematics credits.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 6 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.